Washington statutes.
RCW 18.104.120

Complaints against a well contractor, operator, or trainee—Department's response—Review.

Any person who can demonstrate being materially harmed by the actions or inactions of a well contractor, operator, or trainee, or has knowledge of illegal activities engaged in by a well contractor, operator, or trainee may submit a complaint against the well contractor, operator, or trainee to the department of ecology. The complaint shall be in writing, signed by the complainant, and specify the grievances against the licensee. The department may investigate the complaint to establish the validity of the complaint. In the event evidence shows a violation of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter, the department may respond to the complaint by issuance of an order appropriate to the violation. Review of the order shall be subject to the hearings procedures set forth in RCW 18.104.130.

[ 2005 c 84 s 7; 1993 c 387 s 19; 1983 c 93 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 212 s 12.]